apertium-evn.evn.lexc
LEXICON N-DERIV

%<coll%>:%>%{Я%} N ;
%<coll%>:%>%{Е%} N ; ! Dir/LR
%<com-fam%>:%>н%{A%} N-N ;
%<com-fam%>:%>н%{Э%} N-N ;
%<box%>:%>рук N ;
%<pelt%>:%>кс%{A%} N ;
%<pelt%>:%>кс%{Э%} N ; ! Dir/LR
%<fan%>:%>м%{A%}%{ː%} N-N ;
%<fan%>:%>м%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<place1%>:%>г N ; ! Fixme
%<place2%>:%>с%{A%} N ; ! Fixme
%<place2%>:%>с%{Э%} N ; ! Fixme
%<place3%>:%>с%{A%}%{ː%}г N ; ! Fixme ка%{ː%}г in Boldyrev
%<place3%>:%>с%{Э%}%{ː%}г N ; ! Fixme ка%{ː%}г in Boldyrev ! Dir/LR
%<bush%>:%>мкур%{A%}%{ː%} N ;
%<bush%>:%>мкур%{Э%}%{ː%} N ; ! Dir/LR
%<ptun%>:%>пту N-N ;
%<geo%>:%>ӈн%{A%} N ;
%<geo%>:%>ӈн%{Э%} N ; ! Dir/LR
%<resident%>:%>г%{A%} N-N ;
%<resident%>:%>г%{Э%} N-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<fake%>:%>р%{A%} N-N ;
%<fake%>:%>р%{Э%} N-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<material%>:%>ӈ%{A%}%{ː%}т N ;
%<material%>:%>ӈ%{Э%}%{ː%}т N ; ! Dir/LR
%<animal%>:%>ты%{ː%} N ;
%<fag%>:%>мты N ;
%<man-fan%>:%>м%{A%}ги N-N ;
%<man-fan%>:%>м%{Э%}ги N-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<season%>:%>л%{A%}с%{A%} N ;
%<season%>:%>л%{Э%}с%{Э%} N ; ! Dir/LR
%<dead%>:%>ӈ%{A%}с%{A%} N ;
%<dead%>:%>ӈ%{Э%}с%{Э%} N ; ! Dir/LR
%<clothes%>:%>сик N ;
%<plurality%>:%>н%{A%}к N ;
%<plurality%>:%>н%{Э%}к N ; ! Dir/LR
%<space%>:%>р%{A%}к N ;
%<space%>:%>р%{Э%}к N ; ! Dir/LR
%<big%>:%>к%{A%}ку N-N ;
%<big%>:%>к%{Э%}ку N-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<huge%>:%>пч%{A%}%{ː%}нэ N ;
%<huge%>:%>пч%{Э%}%{ː%}нэ N ; ! Dir/LR
%<atten1%>:%>к%{A%}%{ː%} N-N ;
%<atten1%>:%>к%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<atten2%>:%>ми N ;
%<ints1%>:%>к%{A%}к%{A%}%{ː%} N-N ;
%<ints1%>:%>к%{Э%}к%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<ints2%>:%>м%{A%}м%{A%} N ;
%<ints2%>:%>м%{Э%}м%{Э%} N ; ! Dir/LR
%<ints2%>:%>м%{Э%} N ; ! Dir/LR
%<pejorative%>:%>ч%{A%}%{ː%} N-N ;
%<pejorative%>:%>ч%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<old%>:%>ми%{ː%} N ;
%<side%>:%>%{G%}ид%{A%}%{ː%} N ;
%<side%>:%>%{G%}ид%{Э%}%{ː%} N ; ! Dir/LR
%<side%>:%>%{G%}д%{A%}%{ː%} N ;
%<side%>:%>%{G%}д%{Э%}%{ː%} N ; ! Dir/LR
%<accompaniment%>:%>н%{A%} N-N ;
%<accompaniment%>:%>н%{Э%} N-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<group%>:%>%{Я%} N ;
%<group%>:%>%{Е%} N ; ! Dir/LR
%<restrict%>:%>рикт%{A%} N ;
%<restrict%>:%>рикт%{Э%} N ; ! Dir/LR
%<every%>:%>тыки N-N ;
%<concession%>:%>м%{A%}%{ː%}т N ;
%<concession%>:%>м%{Э%}%{ː%}т N ; ! Dir/LR
%<nearly%>:%>м%{A%}ю N ;
%<nearly%>:%>м%{Э%}ю N ; ! Dir/LR
%<chi%>:чи%{ː%} N ;
%<mni%>:мни%{ː%} N ; ! принадлежность женщины к роду, национальности

%<attr1%>:%>м%{A%} A ; ! a quality denoting material expressed by the base root
%<attr1%>:%>м%{Э%} A ; ! a quality denoting material expressed by the base root ! Dir/LR
%<attr2%>:%>%{D%}ы%{ː%} A ; ! a quality conditioned by the object expressed by the base root
%<attr3%>:%>пты A ; ! temporal quality
%<attr4%>:%>гу%{ː%} A ; ! locative meaning Fixme
%<attr5%>:%>ву A ; ! locative meaning Fixme
%<attr6%>:%>гд%{A%} A ; ! a quality conditioned by an object expressed by the base root
%<attr6%>:%>гд%{Э%} A ; ! a quality conditioned by an object expressed by the base root ! Dir/LR
%<attr7%>:%>р%{A%}гд%{A%} A ; ! quality involving an object expressed by the base root
%<attr7%>:%>р%{Э%}гд%{Э%} A ; ! quality involving an object expressed by the base root ! Dir/LR
%<attr8%>:%>мигд%{A%} A ; ! possessing an object expressed by the base root
%<attr8%>:%>мигд%{Э%} A ; ! possessing an object expressed by the base root ! Dir/LR
%<attr9%>:%>ктур%{A%} A ; ! possessing an object expressed by the base root
%<attr9%>:%>ктур%{Э%} A ; ! possessing an object expressed by the base root ! Dir/LR
%<attr10%>:%>рикт%{A%} A ; ! possessing an object expressed by the base root
%<attr10%>:%>рикт%{Э%} A ; ! possessing an object expressed by the base root ! Dir/LR
%<attr11%>:%>р%{A%} A ; ! possessing a quality conditioned by the object expressed by the base
%<attr11%>:%>р%{Э%} A ; ! possessing a quality conditioned by the object expressed by the base ! Dir/LR
%<attr12%>:%>си A ; ! minlang
%<attr13%>:%>р A ; ! признак по времени


%<vblz1%>:%>м%{A%}%{ː%} V ; ! hunt
%<vblz1%>:%>м%{Э%}%{ː%} V ; ! hunt ! Dir/LR
%<vblz2%>:%>м%{A%} V ; ! go and bring
%<vblz2%>:%>м%{Э%} V ; ! go and bring ! Dir/LR
%<vblz3%>:%>ми V ; ! hunt
%<vblz4%>:%>л%{A%}%{ː%} V ; ! go and gather
%<vblz4%>:%>л%{Э%}%{ː%} V ; ! go and gather ! Dir/LR
%<vblz5%>:%>л%{A%} V ; ! (gather and) bring
%<vblz5%>:%>л%{Э%} V ; ! (gather and) bring ! Dir/LR
%<vblz6%>:%>ли%{ː%} V ; ! go and bring
%<vblz7%>:%>ӈ V ; ! make/build/cook/sew
%<vblz8%>:%>т%{A%} V ; ! live in /use an object for one's advantage + different meanings
%<vblz8%>:%>т%{Э%} V ; ! live in /use an object for one's advantage + different meanings ! Dir/LR
%<vblz9%>:%>д%{A%} V ; ! perform an action with the object expressed by the root
%<vblz9%>:%>д%{Э%} V ; ! perform an action with the object expressed by the root ! Dir/LR
%<vblz10%>:%>ты%{ː%} V ; ! eat
%<vblz11%>:%>му V ; ! smell
%<vblz12%>:%>%{V%}%{u%} V ; ! act with an object expressed by the root
%<vblz13%>:%>%{i%}л V ; ! different meanings
%<vblz14%>:%>м%{A%}т V ; ! reciprocal meaning
%<vblz14%>:%>м%{Э%}т V ; ! reciprocal meaning ! Dir/LR
%<vblz15%>:%>лды V ; ! reciprocal meaning
%<vblz16%>:%>к%{A%}т V ; ! play
%<vblz16%>:%>к%{Э%}т V ; ! play ! Dir/LR
%<vblz17%>:%>г%{A%} V ; ! act with the object expressed by the root
%<vblz17%>:%>г%{Э%} V ; ! act with the object expressed by the root ! Dir/LR
%<vblz18%>:%>г%{A%} V ; ! act with the object expressed by the root
%<vblz18%>:%>г%{Э%} V ; ! act with the object expressed by the root ! Dir/LR
%<vblz19%>:%>мк%{A%} V ; ! test
%<vblz19%>:%>мк%{Э%} V ; ! test ! Dir/LR
%<vblz20%>:%>р%{A%} V ; ! perform an action which involves an object expressed by the root
%<vblz20%>:%>р%{Э%} V ; ! perform an action which involves an object expressed by the root ! Dir/LR
%<vblz21%>:%>н%{A%} V ; ! perform an action involving an object expressed by the root
%<vblz21%>:%>н%{Э%} V ; ! perform an action involving an object expressed by the root ! Dir/LR

LEXICON NOUN

%<n%>: N ;
%<n%>: N-DERIV ;
%<n%>%<child%>:%>тк%{A%}%{ː%} N-N ;
%<n%>%<child%>:%>тк%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<child%>:%>т N ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<child%>:%>т N ; ! Dir/LR


LEXICON NOUN-SG

%<n%>: N-SG ;
%<n%>: N-DERIV ;
%<n%>%<child%>:%>тк%{A%}%{ː%} N-N ;
%<n%>%<child%>:%>тк%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<child%>:%>т N ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<child%>:%>т N ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON NOUN-PL

%<n%>: N-PL ;
%<n%>: N-DERIV ;
%<n%>%<child%>:%>тк%{A%}%{ː%} N-N ;
%<n%>%<child%>:%>тк%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<child%>:%>т N ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<child%>:%>т N ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON NOMINAL-INFL-N

%<sg%>%<nom%>:н POSS-SG-ORON ;
%<sg%>:н CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<sg%>%<ins%>:н%>ди POSS-SG-BIRA ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>р POSS-PL ;
%<pl%>:%>р CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<pl%>%<ins%>:%>р%>ди POSS-SG-BIRA ;

LEXICON NOMINAL-INFL-N-SG

%<sg%>%<nom%>:н POSS-SG-ORON ;
%<sg%>:н CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<sg%>%<ins%>:н%>ди POSS-SG-BIRA ;

LEXICON NOMINAL-INFL-N-PL

%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>р POSS-PL ;
%<pl%>:%>р CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<pl%>%<ins%>:%>р%>ди POSS-SG-BIRA ;

LEXICON N-N-SG

NOMINAL-INFL-N-SG ;
%<indposs%>:н%>ӈ%{i%} NOMINAL-INFL ;

LEXICON N-N-PL

NOMINAL-INFL-N-PL ;
%<indposs%>:н%>ӈ%{i%} NOMINAL-INFL ;

LEXICON N-N

N-N-SG ;
N-N-PL ;
N-DERIV ;
%<child%>:%>чик%{A%}%{ː%} N-N ;
%<child%>:%>чик%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON NOUN-N

%<n%>: N-N ;
%<n%>: N-DERIV ;
%<n%>%<child%>:%>чик%{A%}%{ː%} N-N ;
%<n%>%<child%>:%>чик%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON NOUN-N-SG

%<n%>: N-N-SG ;
%<n%>: N-DERIV ;
%<n%>%<child%>:%>чик%{A%}%{ː%} N-N ;
%<n%>%<child%>:%>чик%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON PRON-PERS-CASES-P12            ! For 1st-person sg, pe (except pi) and 2nd-person sg, pl

%<acc%>%<def%>:%>э CLITICS ;
%<acc%>%<def%>:%>эвэ CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<locdir%>:%>иклэ%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<allprl%>:%>икли%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<ins%>:%>ди CLITICS ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-CASES-OTHER          ! Except 3rd-person sg and pl

%<datloc%>:%>%{D%}у%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<locall%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}лэ%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<all%>:%>т%{i%}ки%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<prl%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}ли%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}ук CLITICS ;
%<ela%>:%>%{G%}ит%{д%} CLITICS ;
%<com%>:%>нун CLITICS ;

PRON-PERS-POSSESSIVE ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS
бӣ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:ми%{э%}н PRON-PERS-CASES-P12 ;
бӣ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:ми%{э%}н PRON-PERS-CASES-OTHER ;
сӣ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:си%{э%}н PRON-PERS-CASES-P12 ;
сӣ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:си%{э%}н PRON-PERS-CASES-OTHER ;
бӯ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pe%>:му%{э%}н PRON-PERS-CASES-P12 ;
бӯ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pe%>:му%{э%}н PRON-PERS-CASES-OTHER ;
мит%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pi%>:ми%{э%}т PRON-PERS-CASES-OTHER ;
сӯ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:су%{э%}н PRON-PERS-CASES-P12 ;
сӯ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:су%{э%}н PRON-PERS-CASES-OTHER ;
 LEXICON Nouns
айку:айку NOUN ; ! 
акӣн:аки%{ː%} NOUN-N-SG ; ! 
акӣн:акни%{ː%} NOUN-PL ; ! 
акчин:акчи NOUN-N ; ! 
амӣн:ами%{ː%} NOUN-N-SG ; !
амӣн:амты%{ː%} NOUN-PL ; ! 
аминми:аминми NOUN ; ! 
анидан:анида NOUN-N ; ! 
арена:арена NOUN ; ! "арена театр."
аси:аси NOUN-SG ;
аси:аса NOUN-PL ;
асӣтка̄н:аси%{ː%}тка%{ː%} NOUN-N ; ! 
аэровокзал:аэровокзал%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from russian
бакалды̄н:бакалды%{ː%} NOUN-N ; ! 
бандит:бандит%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from russian
билкит:билкит NOUN ; ! "гадание"
бичэӈкэн:бичэӈкэ NOUN-N ; ! 
большевик:большевик%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from russian
буденэ̄:буденэ%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
булэн:булэ NOUN-N ; ! "неприятель"
буркилэк:буркилэк NOUN ; ! 
бэрэгӣн:бэрэги%{ː%} NOUN-N ; ! 
бюрократизм:бюрократизм NOUN ; ! "бюрократизм"
вольт:вольт%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from russian
геги:геги NOUN ; ! 
гилды̄н:гилды%{ː%} NOUN-N ; ! 
гудок:гудок%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from russian
гӯлдывун:гу%{ː%}лдыву NOUN-N ; ! 
давдан:давда NOUN-N ; ! 
дёгордёрӣ:дёгордёри%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
дедэн:дедэ NOUN-N ; ! 
долбонӣ:долбони%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
дорогун:дорогу NOUN-N ; ! 
дыӈнимэлэн:дыӈнимэлэ NOUN-N ; ! 
дэгри:дэгри NOUN ; ! 
дюгэчилдын:дюгэчилды NOUN-N ; ! 
дялувгӣн:дялувги%{ː%} NOUN-N ; ! 
дяричимни:дяричимни NOUN ; ! 
иктэн:иктэ NOUN-N ; ! 
икэ̄дерӣ:икэ%{ː%}дери%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
имуптын:имупты NOUN-N ; ! 
ипкэчин:ипкэчи NOUN-N ; ! 
иргалаһа:иргалаһа NOUN ; ! 
ичэвкэ̄н:ичэвкэ%{ː%} NOUN-N ; ! 
кали:кали NOUN ; ! 
камнӣка̄чин:камни%{ː%}ка%{ː%}чи NOUN-N ; ! 
кившим:кившим NOUN ; ! 
кӣкэ̄рин:ки%{ː%}кэ%{ː%}ри NOUN-N ; ! 
колокӣ:колоки%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
ко̄нӣка̄н:ко%{ː%}ни%{ː%}ка%{ː%} NOUN-N ; ! 
котогос:котогос NOUN ; ! 
кулиткан:кулитка NOUN-N ; ! 
куртуяк:куртуяк NOUN ; ! 
кӯһилин:ку%{ː%}һили NOUN-N ; ! 
ламбакчан:ламбакча NOUN-N ; ! 
ларгэксэ:ларгэксэ NOUN ; ! 
лэрекчэн:лэрекчэ NOUN-N ; ! 
манда̄һа:манда%{ː%}һа NOUN ; ! 
мирэптун:мирэпту NOUN-N ; ! 
морковка:морковка%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from russian
мукэрӣкэчэн:мукэри%{ː%}кэчэ NOUN-N ; ! 
мэвчэн:мэвчэ NOUN-N ; ! 
мэһэвкэ:мэһэвкэ NOUN ; ! 
наннака̄н:наннака%{ː%} NOUN-N ; ! 
нимӈэӈкӣ:нимӈэӈки%{ː%} NOUN ; ! "глотка"
нинан:нина NOUN-N ; ! "лось (телёнок)"
нэкубдӯрэн:нэкубду%{ː%}рэ NOUN-N ; ! 
нэкӯн:нэку%{ː%} NOUN-N-SG ;
нэкӯн:нэкни%{ː%} NOUN-PL ;
нэкӯн:нэӈни%{ː%} NOUN-PL ; ! Dir/LR
нюӈнякиӈда:нюӈнякиӈда NOUN ; ! 
ӈэн:ӈэ NOUN-N ; ! 
ӈэри:ӈэри NOUN ; ! 
оӈокто:оӈокто NOUN ; ! "нос"
оӈолокон:оӈолоко NOUN-N ; ! 
перила:перила%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from russian
промысла:промысла NOUN ; ! промысла
саласкачи:саласкачи%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from russian
са̄лдымачин:са%{ː%}лдымачи NOUN-N ; ! 
синица:синица%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from russian
сипкучин:сипкучи NOUN-N ; ! 
столицаган:столицаган%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from russian
суюкан:суюка NOUN-N ; ! 
таз:таз NOUN ; ! 
Толган:Толга NOUN-N ; ! 
торбек:торбек NOUN ; ! 
тыкулмалчарӣ:тыкулмалчари%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
тыливсӣн:тыливси%{ː%} NOUN-N ; ! "понятливость"
тэтывмэчин:тэтывмэчи NOUN-N ; ! 
угу:угу NOUN ; ! "берег (подальше от воды)"
унян:уня NOUN-N ; ! 
ургэ:ургэ NOUN ; ! "тягость (тяжесть, забота)"
халанчан:халанча NOUN-N ; ! "лось (зимой)"
харбака:харбака NOUN ; ! 
хорон:хоро NOUN-N ; ! 
хуриг:хуриг NOUN ; ! 
хэ̄чэн:хэ%{ː%}чэ NOUN-N ; ! 
һирэктын:һирэкты NOUN-N ; ! 
һисэлэ:һисэлэ NOUN ; ! 
һэлэптун:һэлэпту NOUN-N ; ! 
чаду:чаду NOUN ; ! 
чипка̄н:чипка%{ː%} NOUN-N ; ! "соболь зоол. (самец)"
чомпулэ:чомпулэ NOUN ; ! 
шен:ше NOUN-N ; ! 
шилвер:шилвер NOUN ; ! 
экӣн:эки%{ː%} NOUN-N-SG ; ! 
экӣн:экни%{ː%} NOUN-PL ; ! 
эмэвдерӣ:эмэвдери%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
энӣн:эни%{ː%} NOUN-N-SG  ; ! мать
энӣн:энты%{ː%} NOUN-PL ;
энӯниликнэн:эну%{ː%}ниликнэ NOUN-N ; ! 
